test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-atoskîw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - atoskîw :

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nitatoskân   # I work, I do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kitatoskân   # you work, you do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: atoskîw   # he/she works, he/she does work

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-atoskîyân   # as I work, as I do work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-atoskîyan, î-atoskîyin]   # as you work, as you do work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-atoskît   # as he/she works, as he/she does work

      # Imp
      atoskîw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: atoskî   # (you) work now, (you) do work now
      

      # Prs # Ind
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nitatoskân   # I work, I do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kitatoskân   # you work, you do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: atoskîw   # he/she works, he/she does work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nitatoskânân   # we work, we do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kitatoskânaw, kitatoskânânaw]   # we and you work, we and you do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kitatoskânâwâw   # you all work, you all do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: atoskîwak   # they work, they do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: atoskîthiwa   # another/others work, another/others do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+X: [atoskâniwiw, atoskâniwan]   # someone works, someone does work
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-atoskîyân   # as I work, as I do work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-atoskîyan, î-atoskîyin]   # as you work, as you do work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-atoskît   # as he/she works, as he/she does work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-atoskîyâhk   # as we work, as we do work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-atoskîyahk   # as we and you work, as we and you do work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-atoskîyîk   # as you all work, as you all do work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-atoskîcik, î-atoskîtwâw]   # as they work, as they do work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-atoskîthit   # as another/others work, as another/others do work
      PV/î+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-atoskîhk, î-atoskâniwik, î-atoskâniwahk]   # as someone works, as someone does work
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nikî-atoskân   # I worked, I did work
      PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kikî-atoskân   # you worked, you did work
      PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: kî-atoskîw   # he/she worked, he/she did work
      PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nikî-atoskânân   # we worked, we did work
      PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kikî-atoskânaw, kikî-atoskânânaw]   # we and you worked, we and you did work
      PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kikî-atoskânâwâw   # you all worked, you all did work
      PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: kî-atoskîwak   # they worked, they did work
      PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-atoskîthiwa   # another/others worked, another/others did work
      PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+X: [kî-atoskâniwiw, kî-atoskâniwan]   # someone worked, someone did work
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kî-atoskîyân   # as I worked, as I did work
      PV/î+PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-kî-atoskîyan, î-kî-atoskîyin]   # as you worked, as you did work
      PV/î+PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-atoskît   # as he/she worked, as he/she did work
      PV/î+PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-kî-atoskîyâhk   # as we worked, as we did work
      PV/î+PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-kî-atoskîyahk   # as we and you worked, as we and you did work
      PV/î+PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-kî-atoskîyîk   # as you all worked, as you all did work
      PV/î+PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-kî-atoskîcik, î-kî-atoskîtwâw]   # as they worked, as they did work
      PV/î+PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-kî-atoskîthit   # as another/others worked, as another/others did work
      PV/î+PV/ki+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-kî-atoskîhk, î-kî-atoskâniwik, î-kî-atoskâniwahk]   # as someone worked, as someone did work
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwî-atoskân   # I am going to work, I am going to do work
      PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kiwî-atoskân   # you are going to work, you are going to do work
      PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wî-atoskîw   # he/she is going to work, he/she is going to do work
      PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: niwî-atoskânân   # we are going to work, we are going to do work
      PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kiwî-atoskânaw, kiwî-atoskânânaw]   # we and you are going to work, we and you are going to do work
      PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kiwî-atoskânâwâw   # you all are going to work, you all are going to do work
      PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wî-atoskîwak   # they are going to work, they are going to do work
      PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-atoskîthiwa   # another/others are going to work, another/others are going to do work
      PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+X: [wî-atoskâniwiw, wî-atoskâniwan]   # someone is going to work, someone is going to do work
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-wî-atoskîyân   # as I am going to work, as I am going to do work
      PV/î+PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-wî-atoskîyan, î-wî-atoskîyin]   # as you are going to work, as you are going to do work
      PV/î+PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-atoskît   # as he/she is going to work, as he/she is going to do work
      PV/î+PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-wî-atoskîyâhk   # as we are going to work, as we are going to do work
      PV/î+PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-wî-atoskîyahk   # as we and you are going to work, as we and you are going to do work
      PV/î+PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-wî-atoskîyîk   # as you all are going to work, as you all are going to do work
      PV/î+PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-wî-atoskîcik, î-wî-atoskîtwâw]   # as they are going to work, as they are going to do work
      PV/î+PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-wî-atoskîthit   # as another/others are going to work, as another/others are going to do work
      PV/î+PV/wi+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-wî-atoskîhk, î-wî-atoskâniwik, î-wî-atoskâniwahk]   # as someone is going to work, as someone is going to do work
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nika-atoskân   # I will work, I will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kika-atoskân   # you will work, you will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: ka-atoskîw   # he/she will work, he/she will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nika-atoskânân   # we will work, we will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kika-atoskânaw, kika-atoskânânaw]   # we and you will work, we and you will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kika-atoskânâwâw   # you all will work, you all will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: ka-atoskîwak   # they will work, they will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-atoskîthiwa   # another/others will work, another/others will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Ind+X: [ka-atoskâniwiw, ka-atoskâniwan]   # someone will work, someone will do work
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ka-atoskîyân   # I will work, I will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ka-atoskîyan, ka-atoskîyin]   # you will work, you will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ka-atoskît   # he/she will work, he/she will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ka-atoskîyâhk   # we will work, we will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ka-atoskîyahk   # we and you will work, we and you will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ka-atoskîyîk   # you all will work, you all will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ka-atoskîcik, ka-atoskîtwâw]   # they will work, they will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ka-atoskîthit   # another/others will work, another/others will do work
      PV/ka+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ka-atoskîhk, ka-atoskâniwik, ka-atoskâniwahk]   # someone will work, someone will do work
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ta-atoskîyân   # I work, I do work
      PV/ta+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ta-atoskîyan, ta-atoskîyin]   # you work, you do work
      PV/ta+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ta-atoskît   # he/she works, he/she does work
      PV/ta+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ta-atoskîyâhk   # we work, we do work
      PV/ta+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ta-atoskîyahk   # we and you work, we and you do work
      PV/ta+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ta-atoskîyîk   # you all work, you all do work
      PV/ta+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ta-atoskîcik, ta-atoskîtwâw]   # they work, they do work
      PV/ta+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ta-atoskîthit   # another/others work, another/others do work
      PV/ta+atoskîw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ta-atoskîhk, ta-atoskâniwik, ta-atoskâniwahk]   # someone works, someone does work
      

      # Fut # Cond
      atoskîw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: atoskîyâni   # when I work, when I do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: [atoskîyani, atoskîyini]   # when you work, when you do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: atoskîci   # when he/she works, when he/she does work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: atoskîyâhki   # when we work, when we do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: atoskîyahki   # when we and you work, when we and you do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: atoskîyîko   # when you all work, when you all do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: atoskîtwâwi   # when they work, when they do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: atoskîthici   # when another/others work, when another/others do work
      atoskîw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+X: [atoskîhki, atoskîhkwâwi]   # when someone works, when someone does work
      

      # Imp # Imm
      atoskîw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: atoskî   # (you) work now, (you) do work now
      atoskîw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: atoskîtân   # let you and us work now, let you and us do work now
      atoskîw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: atoskîk   # (you all) work now, (you all) do work now
      

      # Imp # Del
      atoskîw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: atoskîhkan   # (you) work later, (you) do work later
      atoskîw+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: atoskîhkahk   # let you and us work later, let you and us do work later
      atoskîw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: atoskîhkîk   # (you all) work later, (you all) do work later
      
